Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-940.01
State Medicaid Fraud Control Unit Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The State Medicaid Fraud Control Unit Cash Fund is created. The fund shall be maintained by the Department of Justice and administered by the Attorney General. The fund shall consist of any recovery for the state's costs and attorney's fees received pursuant to subdivision (2)(b) of section 68-940 and sections 68-936 and 68-939, except criminal penalties, whether such recovery is by way of verdict, judgment, compromise, or settlement in or out of court, or other final disposition of any case or controversy under such subdivision or sections. Money in the fund shall be used to pay the salaries and related expenses of the Department of Justice for the state medicaid fraud control unit.

The State Treasurer shall transfer five hundred thousand dollars from the State Medicaid Fraud Control Unit Cash Fund to the General Fund on or before June 30, 2018, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.

Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2009, LB288, § 23;

Laws 2017, LB331, § 35.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.